Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1331.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 46, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 46-232, to read: START_STATUTE46-232. Supplemental nutrition assistance program; mandatory employment and training The department of economic security shall require able-bodied adults who are under sixty years of age and who are receiving supplemental nutrition assistance to participate in a mandatory employment and training program, as prescribed in 7 United States Code Section 2015(d), unless the recipient is: 1. In compliance with the work registration requirements under title IV of the social security act or the federal-state unemployment compensation system. A recipient who is noncompliant with the work registration requirements under Title IV of the social security act or the federal-state unemployment compensation system is noncompliant with the work requirements of 7 United States Code section 2015(d). 2. A parent or other member of a household who is responsible for the care of an incapacitated person or a dependent child who is under six years of age. 3. A bona fide student who is enrolled at least half time in any recognized school, training program or institution of higher education unless the recipient is ineligible to participate pursuant to 7 United States Code section 2015(e). 4. A regular participant in a drug addiction or an alcoholic treatment and rehabilitation program. 5. Employed at least thirty hours per week or receives weekly earnings that equal the minimum hourly rate under the fair labor standards act of 1938 (52 Stat. 1060; 29 United States Code sections 201 through 219), multiplied by thirty hours. 6. Sixteen, seventeen or eighteen years of age and is not the head of a household or attends school or is enrolled in an employment training program on at least a half-time basis. END_STATUTE